Washington statutes.
RCW 40.04.110

Supreme court and court of appeals reports—Provision by publisher to reporter.

On the publication of each volume of reports the publisher to whom the contract is awarded shall provide to the reporter the number of copies of each volume of supreme court and court of appeals reports necessary for the reporter and the state law library to comply with RCW 40.04.100.

[ 1995 c 257 s 5; 1971 c 42 s 4; 1941 c 150 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8217-7.]